Utah statutes.
20A-6-402.   Ballots for municipal general elections.

(1)  When using a paper ballot at municipal general elections, each election officer shall ensure that:

(a)  the names of the two candidates who received the highest number of votes for mayor in the municipal primary are placed upon the ballot;

(b)  if no municipal primary election was held, the names of the candidates who filed declarations of candidacy for municipal offices are placed upon the ballot;

(c)  for other offices:

(i)  twice the number of candidates as there are positions to be filled are certified as eligible for election in the municipal general election from those candidates who received the greater number of votes in the primary election; and

(ii)  the names of those candidates are placed upon the municipal general election ballot;

(d)  the names of the candidates are placed on the ballot in the order specified under Section 20A-6-305;

(e)  a write-in area is placed upon the ballot that contains, for each office:

(i)  a blank, horizontal line to enable the entry of a valid write-in candidate; and

(ii)  a square or other conforming area that is adjacent to or opposite the blank horizontal line to enable the voter to indicate the voter's vote;

(f)  ballot propositions that have qualified for the ballot, including propositions submitted to the voters by the municipality, municipal initiatives, and municipal referenda, are listed on the ballot in accordance with Section 20A-6-107; and

(g)  bond propositions that have qualified for the ballot are listed on the ballot under the title assigned to each bond proposition under Section 11-14-206.

(2)  When using a punch card ballot at municipal general elections, each election officer shall ensure that:

(a) (i)  the ballot contains a perforated ballot stub at least one inch wide, placed across the top of the ballot;

(ii)  the ballot number and the words "Poll Worker's Initial ____" are printed on the stub; and

(iii)  ballot stubs are numbered consecutively;

(b)  immediately below the perforated ballot stub, the following endorsements are printed in 18 point bold type:

(i)  "Official Ballot for ____ (City or Town), Utah";

(ii)  the date of the election; and

(iii)  a facsimile of the signature of the election officer and the election officer's title in eight-point type;

(c)  immediately below the election officer's title, two one-point parallel horizontal rules separate endorsements from the rest of the ballot;

(d)  immediately below the horizontal rules, an "Instructions to Voters" section is printed in 10-point bold type that states: "To vote for a candidate, place a cross (X) in the square following the name(s) of the person(s) you favor as the candidate(s) for each respective office." followed by two one-point parallel rules;

(e)  after the rules, the designation of the office for which the candidates seek election is printed flush with the left-hand margin and the words, "Vote for one" or "Vote for up to _____ (the number of candidates for which the voter may vote)" are printed to extend to the extreme right of the column in 10-point bold type, followed by a hair-line rule;

(f)  after the hair-line rule, the names of the candidates are printed in heavy face type between lines or rules three-eighths inch apart, in the order specified under Section 20A-6-305 with surnames last and grouped according to the office that they seek;

(g)  a square with sides not less than one-fourth inch long is printed immediately adjacent to the names of the candidates;

(h)  following the name of the last candidate for each office, the ballot contains:

(i)  a write-in space for each elective office where the voter may enter the name of a valid write-in candidate; and

(ii)  a square printed immediately adjacent to the write-in space or line where the voter may vote for the valid write-in candidate; and

(i)  the candidate groups are separated from each other by one light and one heavy line or rule.

(3)  When using a ballot sheet other than a punch card ballot at municipal general elections, each election officer shall ensure that:

(a) (i)  the ballot contains a perforated ballot stub placed across the top of the ballot;

(ii)  the ballot number and the words "Poll Worker's Initial ____" are printed on the stub; and

(iii)  ballot stubs are numbered consecutively;

(b)  immediately below the perforated ballot stub, the following endorsements are printed:

(i)  "Official Ballot for ____ (City or Town), Utah";

(ii)  the date of the election; and

(iii)  a facsimile of the signature of the election officer and the election officer's title;

(c)  immediately below the election officer's title, a distinct border or line separates endorsements from the rest of the ballot;

(d)  immediately below the border or line, an "Instructions to Voters" section is printed that states: "To vote for a candidate, select the name(s) of the person(s) you favor as the candidate(s) for each respective office." followed by another border or line;

(e)  after the border or line, the designation of the office for which the candidates seek election is printed and the words, "Vote for one" or "Vote for up to _____ (the number of candidates for which the voter may vote)" are printed, followed by a line or border;

(f)  after the line or border, the names of the candidates are printed in the order specified under Section 20A-6-305 with surnames last and grouped according to the office that they seek;

(g)  an oval is printed adjacent to the names of the candidates;

(h)  following the name of the last candidate for each office, the ballot contains:

(i)  a write-in space or blank line for each elective office where the voter may enter the name of a valid write-in candidate; and

(ii)  an oval is printed adjacent to the write-in space or line where the voter may vote for the valid write-in candidate; and

(i)  the candidate groups are separated from each other by a line or border.

(4)  When using an electronic ballot at municipal general elections, each election officer shall ensure that:

(a)  the following endorsements are displayed on the first screen of the ballot:

(i)  "Official Ballot for ____ (City or Town), Utah";

(ii)  the date of the election; and

(iii)  a facsimile of the signature of the election officer and the election officer's title;

(b)  immediately below the election officer's title, a distinct border or line separates the endorsements from the rest of the ballot;

(c)  immediately below the border or line, an "Instructions to Voters" section is displayed that states: "To vote for a candidate, select the name(s) of the person(s) you favor as the candidate(s) for each respective office." followed by another border or line;

(d)  after the border or line, the designation of the office for which the candidates seek election is displayed, and the words, "Vote for one" or "Vote for up to _____ (the number of candidates for which the voter may vote)" are displayed, followed by a line or border;

(e)  after the line or border, the names of the candidates are displayed in the order specified under Section 20A-6-305 with surnames last and grouped according to the office that they seek;

(f)  a voting square or position is located adjacent to the name of each candidate;

(g)  following the name of the last candidate for each office, the ballot contains a write-in space where the voter may enter the name of and vote for a valid write-in candidate for the office; and

(h)  the candidate groups are separated from each other by a line or border.

(5)  When a municipality has chosen to nominate candidates by convention or committee, the election officer shall ensure that the party name is included with the candidate's name on the ballot.

